Arkansas, session 2025, HB1648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 53, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
14-53-115. Bomb squad member —— Authority to make arrests.
(a) A member of a municipal fire department bomb squad meeting the
requirements of this section may make arrests for violations:
(1) Of explosives-related incidents or offenses; or
(2) When assisting a law enforcement agency in the state.
(b) A member of a municipal fire department bomb squad may make
arrests under this section if he or she:
(1) Has successfully completed the part-time law enforcement
officer course of study approved by the Arkansas Commission on Law
*SSS093*
03/03/2025 2:04:05 PM SSS093

HB1648
Enforcement Standards and Training and required for specialized police
personnel; and
(2) Is acting in his or her official capacity as a member of a
municipal fire department bomb squad.
(c) A member of a municipal fire department bomb squad who meets the
requirements under subsection (a) of this section shall make arrests in
accordance with § 16-81-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-81-106(f), concerning the authority to
make arrests, is amended to read as follows:
(f) As used in this section, “certified law enforcement officer”
includes a:
(1) A full-time game warden of the Arkansas State Game and Fish
Commission so long as the game warden shall not exercise his or her authority
to the extent that any federal funds would be jeopardized; and
(2) A member of a municipal fire department bomb squad who meets
the requirements under § 14-53-115.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a municipal fire department
bomb squad member does not have the authority to arrest a perpetrator he or
she may encounter in the course of his or her duty; that providing this
authority to a municipal fire department bomb squad member is likely to
prevent an imminent explosives hazard; and that this act is immediately
necessary because residents of this state may be at risk during an
explosives-related incident or offense, which threatens the public peace,
health, and safety of residents of this state. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
03/03/2025 2:04:05 PM SSS093